ko: 장착 나사 크기: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; 기타
en: Mounting thread size: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Other
pl: Rozmiar gwintu montażowego: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Inne
tr: Montaj diş boyutu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Diğer
vi: Kích thước ren gắn: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Khác
da: Monteringsgevindstørrelse: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Andet
pt-BR: Tamanho da rosca de montagem: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Outro
sk-SK: Veľkosť montážneho závitu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Iné
es: Tamaño de rosca de montaje: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Otros
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος στήριξης: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Άλλο
it: Taglia della filettatura di montaggio: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Altro
hu: Rögzítőmenet mérete: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Egyéb
sl-SI: Velikost montažnega navoja: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Drugo
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca de montagem: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Outro
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo sriegio dydis: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Kita
fi: Kiinnityskierteen koko: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Muu
zh-CN: 安装螺纹尺寸: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; 其他
cs: Velikost montážního závitu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Jiné
ro-RO: Mărime filet montare: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Altele
zh-TW: 安裝螺紋尺寸: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; 其他
th: ขนาดเกลียวยึด: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; อื่นๆ
sv: Monteringsgängstorlek: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Övrigt
ru: Размер крепежной резьбы: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Другой
fr: Taille du filetage de montage: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Autre
bg-BG: Размер на резбата за монтаж: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Други
nb: Monteringsgjengestørrelse: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Annet
de: Befestigungsgewindegröße: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Sonstiges
nl: Montage schroefdraadmaat: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Andere
ja: 取り付けねじサイズ: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; その他
hr-HR: Veličina navoja za montiranje: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M12; M6; Ostalo